Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-417
Home health agency, defined.

(1) Home health agency means a person or any legal entity which provides skilled nursing care or a minimum of one other therapeutic service as defined by the department on a full-time, part-time, or intermittent basis to persons in a place of temporary or permanent residence used as the person's home.

(2) Home health agency does not include a PACE center.

(3) Home health agency does not include a person or legal entity that engages only in social work practice as defined in section 38-2119.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 17;

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 9;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 73.